Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-8508
Insurer; rights; duties; notice;
policy; termination; vendor; duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of
law:

(1) An insurer
may terminate or otherwise change the terms and conditions of a policy of
portable electronics insurance only upon providing the vendor and enrolled
customers with at least sixty days' notice, except that:

(a) An insurer
may terminate an enrolled customer's insurance policy upon fifteen days' notice
for:

(i) Discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation in obtaining
coverage or in the presentation of a claim under such policy; or

(ii) Nonpayment
of premium; or

(b) An insurer may immediately terminate an enrolled customer's
insurance policy:

(i) If the enrolled customer ceases to have active service with
the vendor of portable electronics; or

(ii) If an enrolled customer exhausts the
aggregate limit of liability, if any, under the portable electronics insurance
policy and the insurer sends notice of termination to the customer within
thirty days after exhaustion of the limit. If such notice is not sent within
the thirty-day period, the customer shall continue to be enrolled in such
insurance policy notwithstanding the aggregate limit of liability until the
insurer sends notice of termination to the customer;

(2) If the insurer changes
the terms and conditions, the insurer shall provide the vendor with a revised
policy or endorsement and each enrolled customer with a revised certificate,
endorsement, updated brochure, or other evidence indicating a change in the
terms and conditions has occurred and a summary of the material changes;

(3) If a portable
electronics insurance policy is terminated by a vendor, the vendor shall mail
or deliver written notice to each enrolled customer at least thirty days prior
to the termination advising the customer of such termination and of the effective
date of termination; and

(4) If notice is required under this section, it shall be:

(a) In writing
and may be mailed or delivered to a vendor at the vendor's mailing address
and to an enrolled customer at such customer's last-known mailing address
on file with the insurer. The insurer or vendor, as applicable, shall maintain
proof of mailing in a form authorized or accepted by the United States Postal
Service or a commercial mail delivery service; or

(b) In electronic form.
If notice is delivered in electronic form, the insurer or vendor, as applicable,
shall maintain proof that the notice was sent.

Laws 2011, LB535, § 8.